Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189A Driving Under the Influence

189A.005.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Alcohol concentration” means either grams of alcohol per 100 milliliters of blood or grams of alcohol per 210 liters of breath;

“Cabinet” means the Transportation Cabinet;

“Ignition interlock device” or “device” means a device, certified by the Transportation Cabinet for use in this Commonwealth under KRS

189A.350

, that:

Connects a motor vehicle ignition system or motorcycle ignition system to a breath alcohol analyzer and prevents a motor vehicle ignition or motorcycle ignition from starting, and from continuing to operate, if a driver’s breath alcohol concentration exceeds 0.02, as measured by the device; and

Has a fully functional camera that is equipped to record the date, time, and photo of all persons providing breath samples to the device;

Ignition interlock certificate of installation means a certificate providing that the installed ignition interlock device has been installed and is certified for use in the Commonwealth under KRS

189A.350

;

“Ignition interlock device provider” or “provider” means any person or company certified by the Transportation Cabinet to engage in the business of manufacturing, selling, leasing, servicing, or monitoring ignition interlock devices within the Commonwealth;

“Ignition interlock license” means a motor vehicle or motorcycle operator’s license issued or granted by the laws of the Commonwealth of Kentucky that, except for those with an employer exemption under KRS

189A.340

, permits a person to drive only motor vehicles or motorcycles equipped with a functioning ignition interlock device;

“License” means any driver’s or operator’s license or any other license or permit to operate a motor vehicle issued under or granted by the laws of this state including:

Any temporary license or instruction permit;

The privilege of any person to obtain a valid license or instruction permit, or to drive a motor vehicle whether or not the person holds a valid license; and

Any nonresident’s operating privilege as defined in KRS Chapter 186 or 189;

“Limited access highway” has the same meaning as “limited access facility” does in KRS

177.220

;

“Refusal” means declining to submit to any test or tests pursuant to KRS

189A.103

. Declining may be either by word or by the act of refusal. If the breath testing instrument for any reason shows an insufficient breath sample and the alcohol concentration cannot be measured by the breath testing instrument, the law enforcement officer shall then request the defendant to take a blood or urine test in lieu of the breath test. If the defendant then declines either by word or by the act of refusal, he shall then be deemed to have refused if the refusal occurs at the site at which any alcohol concentration or substance test is to be administered; and

When age is a factor, it shall mean age at the time of the commission of the offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (lst Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 1, effective July 1, 1991; 2000, ch. 467, § 1, effective October 1, 2000; 2002, ch. 171, § 1, effective July 15, 2002; 2015 ch. 124, § 1, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.010.
Operating motor vehicle with alcohol concentration of or above 0.08, or of or above 0.02 for persons under age twenty-one, or while under the influence of alcohol, a controlled substance, or other substance which impairs driving ability prohibited — Admissibility of alcohol concentration or controlled substance test results — Presumptions — Penalties — Aggravating circumstances.

A person shall not operate or be in physical control of a motor vehicle anywhere in this state:

Having an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or more as measured by a scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person’s breath or blood taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle;

While under the influence of alcohol;

While under the influence of any other substance or combination of substances which impairs one’s driving ability;

While the presence of a controlled substance listed in subsection (12) of this section is detected in the blood, as measured by a scientifically reliable test, or tests, taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle;

While under the combined influence of alcohol and any other substance which impairs one’s driving ability; or

Having an alcohol concentration of 0.02 or more as measured by a scientifically reliable test or tests of a sample of the person’s breath or blood taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, if the person is under the age of twenty-one (21).

With the exception of the results of the tests administered pursuant to KRS 189A.103(7):

If the sample of the person’s blood or breath that is used to determine the alcohol concentration thereof was obtained more than two (2) hours after cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the test or tests shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(a) or (f) of this section. The results of the test or tests, however, may be admissible in a prosecution under subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section; or

If the sample of the person’s blood that is used to determine the presence of a controlled substance was obtained more than two (2) hours after cessation of operation or physical control of a motor vehicle, the results of the test or tests shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section. The results of the test or tests, however, may be admissible in a prosecution under subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.

In any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section in which the defendant is charged with having operated or been in physical control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, the alcohol concentration in the defendant’s blood as determined at the time of making analysis of his blood or breath shall give rise to the following presumptions:

If there was an alcohol concentration of less than 0.04 based upon the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS

189A.005

, it shall be presumed that the defendant was not under the influence of alcohol; and

If there was an alcohol concentration of 0.04 or greater but less than 0.08 based upon the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS

189A.005

, that fact shall not constitute a presumption that the defendant either was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but that fact may be considered, together with other competent evidence, in determining the guilt or innocence of the defendant.

The provisions of this subsection shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the questions of whether the defendant was under the influence of alcohol or other substances, in any prosecution for a violation of subsection (1)(b) or (e) of this section.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the fact that any person charged with violation of subsection (1) of this section is legally entitled to use any substance, including alcohol, shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violation of subsection (1) of this section.

A laboratory test or tests for a controlled substance shall be inadmissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section upon a finding by the court that the defendant consumed the substance under a valid prescription from a practitioner, as defined in KRS

218A.010

, acting in the course of his or her professional practice. However, a laboratory test for a controlled substance may be admissible as evidence in a prosecution under subsection (1)(c) or (e) of this section.

Any person who violates the provisions of paragraph (a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) of subsection (1) of this section shall:

For the first offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor more than thirty (30) days, or both. Following sentencing, the defendant may apply to the judge for permission to enter a community labor program for not less than forty-eight (48) hours nor more than thirty (30) days in lieu of fine or imprisonment, or both. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this section are present while the person was operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be four (4) days, which term shall not be suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early release;

For the second offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than three hundred fifty dollars ($350) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than seven (7) days nor more than six (6) months and, in addition to fine and imprisonment, may be sentenced to community labor for not less than ten (10) days nor more than six (6) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be fourteen (14) days, which term shall not be suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early release;

For a third offense within a ten (10) year period, be fined not less than five hundred dollars ($500) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall be imprisoned in the county jail for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than twelve (12) months and may, in addition to fine and imprisonment, be sentenced to community labor for not less than thirty (30) days nor more than twelve (12) months. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be sixty (60) days, which term shall not be suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of early release;

For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period, be guilty of a Class D felony. If any of the aggravating circumstances listed in subsection (11) of this section are present, the mandatory minimum term of imprisonment shall be two hundred forty (240) days, which term shall not be suspended, probated, conditionally discharged, or subject to any other form of release; and

For purposes of this subsection, prior offenses shall include all convictions in this state, and any other state or jurisdiction, for operating or being in control of a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other substances that impair one’s driving ability, or any combination of alcohol and such substances, or while having an unlawful alcohol concentration, or driving while intoxicated, but shall not include convictions for violating subsection (1)(f) of this section. A court shall receive as proof of a prior conviction a copy of that conviction, certified by the court ordering the conviction.

Any person who violates the provisions of subsection (1)(f) of this section shall be fined no less than one hundred dollars ($100) and no more than five hundred dollars ($500), or sentenced to twenty (20) hours of community service in lieu of a fine. A person subject to the penalties of this subsection shall not be subject to the penalties established in subsection (5) of this section or any other penalty established pursuant to KRS Chapter 189A, except those established in KRS 189A.040(1) and KRS

189A.070

.

If the person is under the age of twenty-one (21) and there was an alcohol concentration of 0.08 or greater based on the definition of alcohol concentration in KRS

189A.005

, the person shall be subject to the penalties established pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

For a second or third offense within a ten (10) year period, the minimum sentence of imprisonment or community labor shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release. For a fourth or subsequent offense under this section, the minimum term of imprisonment shall be one hundred twenty (120) days, and this term shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release. For a second or subsequent offense, at least forty-eight (48) hours of the mandatory sentence shall be served consecutively.

When sentencing persons under subsection (5)(a) of this section, at least one (1) of the penalties shall be assessed and that penalty shall not be suspended, probated, or subject to conditional discharge or other form of early release.

In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered.

For purposes of this section, aggravating circumstances are any one (1) or more of the following:

Operating a motor vehicle in excess of thirty (30) miles per hour above the speed limit;

Operating a motor vehicle in the wrong direction on a limited access highway;

Operating a motor vehicle that causes an accident resulting in death or serious physical injury as defined in KRS

500.080

;

Operating a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration in the operator’s blood or breath is 0.15 or more as measured by a test or tests of a sample of the operator’s blood or breath taken within two (2) hours of cessation of operation of the motor vehicle;

Refusing to submit to any test or tests of one’s blood, breath, or urine requested by an officer having reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating or in physical control of a motor vehicle in violation of subsection (1) of this section, except it shall not be considered an aggravating circumstance for a first offense under subsection (5)(a) of this section; and

Operating a motor vehicle that is transporting a passenger under the age of twelve (12) years old.

The substances applicable to a prosecution under subsection (1)(d) of this section are:

Any Schedule I controlled substance except marijuana;

Alprazolam;

Amphetamine;

Buprenorphine;

Butalbital;

Carisoprodol;

Cocaine;

Diazepam;

Hydrocodone;

Meprobamate;

Methadone;

Methamphetamine;

Oxycodone;

Promethazine;

Propoxyphene; and

Zolpidem.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 2, effective July 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 198, § 10, effective October 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 124, § 8, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 606, § 171, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 467, § 2, effective October 1, 2000; 2002, ch. 183, § 19, effective August 1, 2002; 2010, ch. 149, § 17, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 85, § 1, effective April 9, 2016; 2019 ch. 103, § 2, effective July 1, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(4/9/2016). 2016 Ky. Acts ch. 85, sec. 10 provided that that Act shall be known as the Brianna Taylor Act. This statute was amended in Section 1 of that Act.

189A.015.
Offenses committed prior to July 13, 1984. [Repealed.]

189A.020.
Community labor program — Terms and conditions.

All community labor shall be under the supervision of the court and subject to the following:

No period of labor shall be less than four (4) hours to qualify for satisfaction of a sentence;

A “day” shall mean eight (8) hours of labor;

A “month” shall mean twenty (20) days of labor;

Periods of labor four (4) hours or longer may be cumulated to meet the requirements under this section;

Labor shall be done for public agencies, nonprofit corporations or eleemosynary institutions only;

Any agency for whom a person works shall agree to supervise such person and report to the court:

The hours worked,

The quality of the work,

The nature of the work;

An agency may refuse to accept persons under this program or to accept any particular person or persons sent by the court;

The court shall maintain a list of agencies willing to accept and supervise persons sentenced under this program;

The court may contract, at no cost to the state or participant, with any public agency or nonprofit corporation or eleemosynary institution for the supervision of persons in the program;

No work performed under this program shall be deemed employment for any purpose nor shall the person performing such work be considered an employee;

Failure to complete the community labor ordered by the court, to perform diligently at that labor, or to pay the fee required shall constitute contempt of court and the court shall, in addition to any other remedy for contempt, reinstitute all penalties which were previously imposed but suspended or delayed pending completion of the community labor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 2, effective July 13, 1984.

189A.030.
Terms of imprisonment for first and second offenders.

Terms of imprisonment for first and second offenders under KRS

189A.010

shall, at the order of the court, be served on weekends or such other times as may preserve the employment or education of the offender, provided that no individual period of incarceration shall be less than twenty-four (24) hours.

Children shall be detained pursuant to the applicable provisions of KRS Chapters 600 to 645.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 423, § 186, effective July 1, 1987; 1988, ch. 350, § 140, effective April 10, 1988.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Petrilli, Kentucky Family Law, Juvenile Court, § 32.14.

189A.040.
Alcohol or substance abuse treatment and education programs — Sentencing offenders to programs — Regulation of programs — Medicaid-eligible defendants — Appeals of decisions regarding licensure of education and treatment facilities and programs.

In addition to any other penalty prescribed by KRS 189A.010(5)(a) or (6), the court shall sentence the person to attend an alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program subject to the following terms and conditions for a first offender or a person convicted under KRS 189A.010(1)(f):

The treatment or education shall be for a period of ninety (90) days and the program shall provide an assessment of the defendant’s alcohol or other substance abuse problems, which shall be performed at the start of the program;

Each defendant shall pay the cost of the education or treatment program up to his ability to pay but no more than the actual cost of the treatment;

Upon written report to the court by the administrator of the program that the defendant has completed the program recommended by the administrator based upon the assessment of the defendant, the defendant shall be released prior to the expiration of the ninety (90) day period; and

Failure to complete the education or treatment program or to pay the amount specified by the court for education or treatment shall constitute contempt, and the court shall, in addition to any other remedy for contempt, reinstitute all penalties which were previously imposed but suspended or delayed pending completion of the education or treatment program.

In addition to any other penalty prescribed by KRS 189A.010(5)(b), the court shall sentence the person to an alcohol or substance abuse treatment program subject to the following terms and conditions for a second offender:

The sentence shall be for a period of one (1) year and the program shall provide an assessment of the defendant’s alcohol or other substance abuse problems, which shall be performed at the start of the program;

Each defendant shall pay the cost of the treatment program up to his ability to pay but no more than the actual cost of the treatment;

Upon written report to the court by the administrator of the program that the defendant has completed the program recommended by the administrator based upon the assessment of the defendant, the defendant may be released prior to the expiration of the one (1) year period; and

Failure to complete the treatment program or to pay the amount specified by the court for treatment shall constitute contempt of court and the court shall, in addition to any other remedy for contempt, reinstitute all penalties which were previously imposed but suspended or delayed pending the completion of the treatment program.

In addition to any other penalty prescribed by KRS 189A.010(5)(c) or (d), the court shall sentence the person to an alcohol or substance abuse treatment program subject to the following terms and conditions for a third or subsequent offender:

The sentence shall be for a period of one (1) year and the program shall provide an assessment of the defendant’s alcohol or other substance abuse problems, which shall be performed at the start of the program. The program may be an inpatient or residential-type program;

Each defendant shall pay the cost of the treatment program up to his ability to pay but no more than the actual cost of the program;

A defendant, upon written recommendation to the court by the administrator of the program, may be released from the inpatient or residential program prior to the expiration of one (1) year but shall be retained in the program on an outpatient basis for the remainder of the year period; and

Failure to complete the treatment program or to pay the amount specified by the court for treatment shall constitute contempt of court, and the court shall, in addition to any other remedy for contempt, reinstitute all penalties which were previously imposed but suspended or delayed pending completion of the treatment program.

Costs of treatment or education programs which are paid from the service fee established by KRS

189A.050

, or from state or federal funds, or any combination thereof, shall be deducted from the amount which the defendant must pay.

For defendants who are Medicaid-eligible, alcohol or substance abuse treatment under this section shall be authorized by the Department for Medicaid Services and its contractors as Medicaid-eligible services and shall be subject to the same medical necessity criteria and reimbursement methodology as for all other covered behavioral health services.

For the purposes of this section, “treatment” means service in an alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program or facility licensed, regulated, and monitored by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services for services as required under this section.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative regulations for the licensure of education and treatment facilities and programs for offenders receiving education or treatment under this section. The criteria developed by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall include:

Manner of assessment;

Appropriate education and treatment plans; and

Referrals to other treatment providers.

The participating facilities and programs shall be required to abide by these standards and shall report completion to the Transportation Cabinet. Upon request, the facility or program shall report to the courts regarding the progress of offenders being treated pursuant to this section.

Administrative decisions regarding the licensure of education and treatment facilities and programs may be appealed, and upon appeal an administrative hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 3, effective July 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 318, § 75, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 426, § 125, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 467, § 3, effective October 1, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 146, effective June 20, 2005; 2010, ch. 149, § 18, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 103, § 3, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.045.
Enrollment in alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment programs — Attendance — Reporting and effect of failure to attend — Reporting of completion of program.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, when a court requires a defendant to enroll in an alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program pursuant to this chapter, it shall require the defendant to accomplish the enrollment within ten (10) days of the entry of judgment of conviction.

A defendant may choose to enroll in an alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program prior to conviction. If a defendant chooses to enroll prior to conviction, the alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment completed prior to conviction shall count towards the period of alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment required pursuant to KRS

189A.040

.

When a defendant enrolls in the program, the administrator of the program or his authorized representative shall transmit to the court a certificate of enrollment within five (5) working days of the enrollment.

If the court does not receive a certificate of enrollment from the administrator of a program to which the defendant has been assigned within twenty (20) days of the entry of judgment of conviction, the court shall hold a hearing requiring the defendant to show cause why he did not enroll.

If a defendant enrolled in an alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program drops out of the program or does not maintain satisfactory attendance at the program, the administrator of the program or his authorized representative shall transmit to the court a notice describing the defendant’s failure to attend.

Upon receipt of a notice of failure to attend a required alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program, the court shall hold a hearing requiring the defendant to show cause why he should not be held in contempt of court and be subject to the reinstatement of any penalties which may have been withheld pending completion of treatment.

When a defendant completes the required alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program, the administrator of the program shall notify the court and the Transportation Cabinet of the defendant’s completion of the program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 4, effective July 1, 1991; 2019 ch. 103, § 4, effective July 1, 2020.

189A.050.
Service fee — Amount — Payment — Remedies for nonpayment — Use of revenue from fees collected.

All persons convicted of violation of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e) shall be sentenced to pay a service fee of four hundred twenty-five dollars ($425), which shall be in addition to all other penalties authorized by law.

The fee shall be imposed in all cases but shall be subject to the provisions of KRS

534.020

and KRS

534.060

.

The first fifty dollars ($50) of each service fee imposed by this section shall be paid into the general fund, the second fifty dollars ($50) of each service fee imposed by this section shall be paid to the ignition interlock administration fund established in KRS

189A.380

, and the remainder of the revenue collected from the service fee imposed by this section shall be utilized as follows:

Twelve percent (12%) shall be transferred to the Department of Kentucky State Police forensic laboratory for the acquisition, maintenance, testing, and calibration of alcohol concentration testing instruments and the training of laboratory personnel to perform these tasks;

Twenty percent (20%) shall be allocated to the Department of Public Advocacy;

One percent (1%) shall be transferred to the Prosecutor’s Advisory Council for training of prosecutors for the prosecution of persons charged with violations of this chapter and for obtaining expert witnesses in cases involving the prosecution of persons charged with violations of this chapter or any other offense in which driving under the influence is a factor in the commission of the offense charged;

Sixteen percent (16%) shall be transferred as follows:

Fifty percent (50%) shall be credited to the traumatic brain injury trust fund established under KRS

211.476

; and

Fifty percent (50%) shall be credited to the Cabinet for Health and Family Services, Department for Behavioral Health, Developmental and Intellectual Disabilities, for the purposes of providing direct services to individuals with brain injuries that may include long-term supportive services and training and consultation to professionals working with individuals with brain injuries. As funding becomes available under this subparagraph, the cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A to implement the services permitted by this subparagraph;

Any amount specified by a specific statute shall be transferred as provided in that statute;

Forty-six percent (46%) shall be transferred to be utilized to fund enforcement of this chapter and for the support of jails, recordkeeping, treatment, and educational programs authorized by this chapter and by the Department of Public Advocacy; and

The remainder shall be transferred to the general fund.

The amounts specified in subsection (3)(a), (b), (c), and (d) of this section shall be placed in trust and agency accounts that shall not lapse.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 5, effective July 13, 1984; 1994, ch. 395, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2000, ch. 467, § 4, effective October 1, 2000; 2004, ch. 137, § 1, effective July 13, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 147, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 85, § 213, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 158, § 6, effective July 1, 2008; 2010, ch. 149, § 19, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 146, § 16, effective July 12, 2012; 2012, ch. 158, § 11, effective July 12, 2012; 2017 ch. 158, § 10, effective June 29, 2017; 2017 ch. 167, § 12, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 91, § 36, effective April 15, 2020.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2012). This statute was amended by 2012 Ky. Acts chs. 146 and 158, which are in conflict. Under KRS

446.250

, Acts. ch. 146, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails.

(6/26/2007). 2007 Ky. Acts ch. 85, relating to the creation and organization of the Justice and Public Safety Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

2022-2024 Budget Reference.

See State/Executive Branch Budget, 2022 Ky. Acts ch. 199, Pt. I, H, 4, (2) at 1684.

189A.060.
Pretrial suspension of operator’s license. [Repealed.]

189A.070.
License revocations — Time periods — Completion of alcohol or substance treatment or education program required before reinstatement.

Unless the person is under eighteen (18) years of age, in addition to the penalties specified in KRS

189A.010

, the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend a person’s license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon conviction of KRS

189A.010

(1).
(1) (a) 1. Unless the person is under eighteen (18) years of age, in addition to the penalties specified in KRS 189A.010, the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend a person’s license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1).

Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), or (e), the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend a person’s license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle as follows:

For the first offense within a ten (10) year period:

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

and who meets the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, four (4) months;

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS

189A.340

but does not meet the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the person meets the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement or six (6) months, whichever is shorter; or

For all others, six (6) months;

For the second offense within a ten (10) year period:

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first twelve (12) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, twelve (12) months;

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first twelve (12) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement or eighteen (18) months, whichever is shorter; or

For all others, eighteen (18) months;

For a third offense within a ten (10) year period:

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first eighteen (18) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, eighteen (18) months;

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first eighteen (18) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement or thirty-six (36) months, whichever is shorter; or

For all others, thirty-six (36) months;

For a fourth or subsequent offense within a ten (10) year period:

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS 189A.340 and who meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first thirty (30) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, thirty (30) months;

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement within the first thirty (30) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the person meets the one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement or sixty (60) months, whichever is shorter; or

For all others, sixty (60) months;

If the conviction records transmitted to the Transportation Cabinet pursuant to subsection (3) of this section show that a person was convicted of a:

First offense of KRS 189A.010, the person’s license shall be suspended as provided in subdivision a. of this subparagraph;

Second offense of KRS 189A.010, the person’s license shall be suspended as provided in subdivision b. of this subparagraph;

Third offense of KRS 189A.010, the person’s license shall be suspended as provided in subdivision c. of this subparagraph; and

Fourth or subsequent offense of KRS 189A.010, the person’s license shall be suspended as provided in subdivision d. of this subparagraph; and

The license suspension shall be deemed effective on the date of entry of the court’s order or judgement for a conviction of KRS 189A.010.

Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1)(f), the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend a person’s license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle as follows:

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS 189A.340 and who meets the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, four (4) months;

For a person who is issued an ignition interlock license under KRS 189A.340 but does not meet the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement within the first four (4) months of the issuance of the ignition interlock license, until the person meets the ninety (90) consecutive day requirement or six (6) months, whichever is shorter; or

For all others, six (6) months.

For purposes of this paragraph, “ninety (90) consecutive day requirement” and “one hundred twenty (120) consecutive day requirement” mean the requirements established in KRS 189A.340(4)(b)2.

For a person under the age of eighteen (18), in addition to the penalties specified in KRS 189A.010, the Transportation Cabinet shall suspend the person’s license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1). The person shall have his or her license suspended until he or she reaches the age of eighteen (18) or as provided in paragraph (a) of this subsection, whichever penalty will result in the longer period of suspension.

In addition to the period of license suspension set forth in subsection (1) of this section, no person shall be eligible for reinstatement of his or her full privilege to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle until he or she has completed the alcohol or substance abuse education or treatment program ordered pursuant to KRS

189A.040

.

Upon conviction of KRS 189A.010(1):

A person shall surrender his or her license to operate a motor vehicle or motorcycle to the court. Should the person fail to surrender his or her license to the court, the court shall issue an order directing the sheriff or any other peace officer to seize the license forthwith and deliver it to the court. The court shall then forward the license to the Transportation Cabinet. This paragraph shall not apply to a person who has previously surrendered his or her license pursuant to KRS

189A.200

; and

The court shall immediately transmit the conviction records and other appropriate information to the Transportation Cabinet. A court shall not waive or stay this procedure.

In determining the ten (10) year period under this section, the period shall be measured from the dates on which the offenses occurred for which the judgments of conviction were entered.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 7, effective July 13, 1984; 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 5, effective July 1, 1991; 1996, ch. 198, § 12, effective October 1, 1996; 2000, ch. 467, § 5, effective October 1, 2000; 2002, ch. 171, § 2, effective July 15, 2002; 2010, ch. 149, § 20, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 124, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2016 ch. 85, § 2, effective April 9, 2016; repealed and reenacted by 2019 ch. 103, § 5, effective March 26, 2019.

189A.080.
Surrender and forwarding of suspended or revoked licenses. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 165, § 8, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 467, § 6, effective October 1, 2000; repealed by 2019 ch. 103, § 25, effective July 1, 2020.